New York, session 2025-2026, S6504.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 837 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. In cooperation with any other public or private agency, including 4 law enforcement agencies, develop a human trafficking interceptors 5 program. The division may issue appropriate guidelines and may adopt, 6 amend or rescind any rules and regulations as may be necessary or 7 convenient to the operation of the program. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10945-01-5